District of Columbia statutes.
29-703.06

Person erroneously believing self to be limited partner.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a person that makes an investment in a business enterprise and erroneously but in good faith believes that the person has become a limited partner in the enterprise shall not be liable for the enterprise’s obligations by reason of making the investment, receiving distributions from the enterprise, or exercising any rights of or appropriate to a limited partner, if, on ascertaining the mistake, the person:

(1)

Causes an appropriate certificate of limited partnership, amendment, or statement of correction to be signed and delivered to the Mayor for filing; or

(2)

Withdraws from future participation as an owner in the enterprise by signing and delivering to the Mayor for filing a statement of withdrawal under this section.

(b)

A person that makes an investment described in subsection (a) of this section shall be liable to the same extent as a general partner to any third party that enters into a transaction with the enterprise, believing in good faith that the person is a general partner, before the Mayor files a statement of withdrawal, certificate of limited partnership, amendment, or statement of correction to show that the person is not a general partner.

(c)

If a person makes a diligent effort in good faith to comply with subsection (a)(1) of this section and is unable to cause the appropriate certificate of limited partnership, amendment, or statement of correction to be signed and delivered to the Mayor for filing, the person shall have the right to withdraw from the enterprise pursuant to subsection (a)(2) of this section even if the withdrawal would otherwise breach an agreement with others that are or have agreed to become co-owners of the enterprise.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-702.04.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 306 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).